Washington statutes.
RCW 7.07.090

Participation in mediation.

An attorney or other individual designated by a party may accompany the party to and participate in a mediation, except that if the dispute being mediated is the subject of pending proceedings under chapter 12.40 RCW, then a party may not be represented by an attorney in mediation unless the party may be represented by an attorney in the proceedings under chapter 12.40 RCW. A waiver of participation given before the mediation may be rescinded.

[ 2005 c 172 s 10.]